Hawaii statutes.
§480-16 Violation a felony. (a) Any
person who violates section 480-4, 480-6, 480-9, or 480-17, including any
principal, manager, director, officer, agent, servant, or employee, who had
engaged in or has participated in the determination to engage in an activity
that has been engaged in by any association, firm, partnership, trust or
corporation, which activity is a violation of section 480-4, 480-6, 480-9, or
480-17, is punishable if a natural person by a fine not exceeding $100,000 or
by imprisonment not exceeding three years, or by both such fine and
imprisonment, in the discretion of the court; if the person is not a natural
person then by a fine not exceeding $1,000,000.

(b) The actions authorized by this section and
section 480-18 shall be brought in the circuit court of the circuit where the
offense occurred. [L 1961, c 190, §14; Supp, §205A-14; HRS §480-16; am L 1975,
c 94, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next